Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.030

Resolution method.

When a majority of the legislative body of an incorporated city or town determines that it would serve the best interests and general welfare of such municipality to change the classification of such city or town to that of noncharter code city, such legislative body may, by resolution, declare its intention to adopt for the city or town the classification of noncharter code city. If the legislative body so determines, such resolution may also contain a declaration of intention to reorganize the municipal government under one of the plans of government authorized in this title, naming such plan; but it shall also be lawful for the legislative body of any incorporated city or town which is governed under a plan of government authorized prior to the time this title takes effect to adopt for the city or town the classification of noncharter code city while retaining the same general plan of government under which such city or town is then operating. Within ten days after the passage of the resolution, the legislative body shall cause it to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town. Upon the expiration of the ninetieth day from, but excluding the date of first publication of the resolution, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has been filed pursuant to RCW 35A.02.035, as determined by RCW 35A.29.170, the intent expressed in such resolution shall at the next regular meeting of the legislative body be effected by an ordinance adopting for the city or town the classification of noncharter code city; and, if the resolution includes a declaration of intention to reorganize, the legislative body shall provide at that time for such reorganization by ordinance.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.